Illinois, session 104th, SB2179.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Boat Registration and Safety Act is amended 5by changing Sections 1-2, 2-2, 3-11, 4-2, 4-4, 4-11, 5-13, 65-18, 7-1, and 7-2 as follows: 7    (625 ILCS 45/1-2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 311-2)8    Sec. 1-2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 9context clearly requires a different meaning:10    "Airboat" means a vessel that is typically flat-bottomed 11and propelled by an aircraft-type propeller powered by an 12engine.13    "Boating accident" means a collision, accident, or 14casualty involving a vessel in or upon, or entering into or 15exiting from, the water, including capsizing, collision with 16another vessel or object, sinking, personal injury, death, 17disappearance of a person from on board under circumstances 18that indicate the possibility of death or injury, or property 19damage to any vessel or dock. 20    "Competent" means capable of assisting a water skier in 21case of injury or accident.22    "Consideration" means an economic benefit, inducement, 23right, or profit, including pecuniary payment accruing to an   SB2179 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1individual, person, or entity, but not including a voluntary 2sharing of the actual expense of the voyage, by monetary 3contribution or donation of fuel, food, beverage, or other 4supplies. 5    "Dealer" means any person who engages in the business of 6manufacturing, selling, or dealing in, on consignment or 7otherwise, any number of new watercraft or 5 or more used 8watercraft of any make during the year, including any 9off-highway vehicle dealer or snowmobile dealer or a person 10licensed as a new or used vehicle dealer who also sells or 11deals in, on consignment or otherwise, any number of 12watercraft as defined in this Act.13    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.14    "Inland Rules" means the Inland Navigation Rules Act of 151980.16    "International regulations" means the International 17Regulations for Preventing Collisions at Sea, 1972, including 18annexes currently in force for the United States.19    "Leeward side" means the side of a vessel's sail that is 20facing away or sheltered from the wind.21    "Lifeboat" means a small boat kept on board a larger boat 22for use in an emergency.23    "Livery" means a person, corporation, company, business, 24or entity that advertises a livery watercraft for use by 25another, in exchange for any type of consideration and does 26not provide the renter or lessee with a captain, crew, or any   SB2179 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1staff or personnel to operate, oversee, maintain, or manage 2the watercraft. 3    "Motorboat" or "power-driven vessel" means any vessel 4propelled by machinery whether such machinery is a principle 5source of propulsion.6    "Nonpowered watercraft" or "human-powered watercraft" 7means any canoe, kayak, kiteboard, paddleboard, ribbed 8inflatable, or any other watercraft propelled by oars, 9paddles, or poles but not powered by sail, canvas, human body 10part, or machinery of any sort.11    "Operate" means to use, navigate, employ, or otherwise be 12in actual physical control of a motorboat or vessel.13    "Operator" means a person who operates or is in actual 14physical control of a watercraft.15    "Owner" means a person, other than a secured party, having 16property rights or title to a watercraft. "Owner" includes a 17person entitled to the use or possession of a motorboat 18subject to an interest in another person, reserved or created 19by agreement and securing payment of performance of an 20obligation. "Owner" does not include a lessee under a lease 21not intended as security.22    "Passenger" means an individual carried on the vessel. 23"Passenger" does not mean:24        (1) the owner or individual representative of the 25    owner, or in the case of a chartered vessel, an individual 26    charterer or individual representative of the charterer,   SB2179 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1    but in no case shall this exemption found in this 2    paragraph apply to more than one person that is physically 3    present on a vessel at any one time;4        (2) the master; or5        (3) a member of the crew engaged in the business of the 6    vessel who has not contributed consideration for carriage 7    and who is paid for on board services.8    "Passenger for hire" means a passenger for whom 9consideration is contributed as a condition of carriage on the 10vessel. 11    "Person" means any individual, firm, corporation, 12partnership, or association, and any agent, assignee, trustee, 13executor, receiver, or representative thereof.14    "Personal flotation device" or "PFD" means a device that 15is approved by the Commandant, U.S. Coast Guard, under Part 16160 of Title 46 of the Code of Federal Regulations.17    "Personal injury" means any injury requiring treatment 18beyond first aid. 19    "Personal watercraft" means a vessel propelled by a water 20jet pump or other machinery as its primary source of motive 21power and designed to be operated by a person sitting, 22standing, or kneeling on the vessel, rather than within the 23confines of a hull.24    "Principally operated" means the vessel is or will be 25primarily operated within the jurisdiction of the State during 26a calendar year.  SB2179 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1    "Recreational boat" means any vessel manufactured or used 2primarily for noncommercial use, or leased, rented, or 3chartered to another for noncommercial use.4    "Sailboat" or "sailing vessel" means any vessel under sail 5so long as the propelling machinery, if fitted, is not being 6used.7    "Seaplane" means any aircraft designed to maneuver on the 8water.9    "Specialty prop-craft" means a vessel that is similar in 10appearance and operation to a personal watercraft but that is 11powered by an outboard or propeller driven motor.12    "Throwable PFD" has the meaning provided in 33 CFR 175.13.13    "Underway" applies to a vessel or watercraft at all times 14except when it is moored at a dock or anchorage area.15    "Use" applies to all vessels on the waters of this State, 16whether moored or underway.17    "Vessel" or "watercraft" means every device or boat 18watercraft used or capable of being used as a means of 19transportation on water, except a seaplane on the water, air 20mattress or similar device, and boats used for concession 21rides in artificial bodies of water designed and used 22exclusively for such concessions.23    "Waters of this State" means any water within the 24jurisdiction of this State.25    "Wearable U.S. Coast Guard approved personal flotation 26device", "wearable U.S. Coast Guard approved PFD", and   SB2179 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1"wearable PFD" have the meaning provided for "wearable PFD" in 233 CFR 175.13.3    "Windward side" means the side of a vessel's sail that has 4the wind blowing into the sail.5    "Wing in Ground" (WIG) vessel means a multimodal vessel 6which, in its main operational mode, flies in close proximity 7to the surface utilizing surface-effect action. 8(Source: P.A. 102-595, eff. 6-1-22.) 9    (625 ILCS 45/2-2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 312-2)10    Sec. 2-2. Inspection; removal; impoundment. 11    (a) Agents of the Department or other duly authorized 12police officers may board and inspect any watercraft boat at 13any time for the purpose of determining if this Act is being 14complied with. If the boarding officer or agent discovers any 15violation of this Act, he may issue a summons to the operator 16of the boat requiring that the operator appear before the 17circuit court for the county within which the offense was 18committed.19    (b) Every watercraft vessel subject to this Act, if under 20way and upon being hailed by a designated law enforcement 21officer, must stop immediately and lay to.22    (c) Agents of the Department and other duly authorized 23police officers may enforce all federal laws and regulations 24which have been mutually agreed upon by the federal and state 25governments and are applicable to the operation of watercraft   SB2179 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1on navigable waters and federal impoundments where concurrent 2jurisdiction exists between the federal and state governments.3    (d) Agents of the Department and other duly authorized 4police officers may seize and impound, at the owner's or 5operator's expense, any watercraft involved in a boating 6accident or a violation of Section 3A-21, 5-1, 5-2, or 5-16 of 7this Act.8    (e) If a watercraft is causing a traffic hazard because of 9its position on a waterway or its physical appearance is 10causing the impeding of traffic, its immediate removal from 11the waterway by a towing service may be authorized by a law 12enforcement agency having jurisdiction.13    (f) Whenever a peace officer reasonably believes that a 14person under arrest for a violation of Section 5-1, 5-2, or 155-16 of this Act or similar provision of a local ordinance, is 16likely, upon release, to commit a subsequent violation of 17Section 5-1, 5-2, or 5-16 or a similar provision of a local 18ordinance, the arresting officer shall have the watercraft 19which the person was operating at the time of the arrest 20impounded for a period of not more than 12 hours after the time 21of the arrest. The watercraft may be released by the arresting 22law enforcement agency without impoundment, or may be released 23prior to the end of the impoundment period, however, if: 24        (1) the watercraft was not owned by the person under 25    arrest, and the lawful owner requesting release possesses 26    proof of ownership, and would not, as determined by the   SB2179 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1    arresting law enforcement agency: (i) indicate a lack of 2    ability to operate a watercraft in a safe manner, or (ii) 3    otherwise, by operating the watercraft, be in violation of 4    this Act; or 5        (2) the watercraft is owned by the person under 6    arrest, and the person under arrest gives permission to 7    another person to operate the watercraft, and the other 8    person would not, as determined by the arresting law 9    enforcement agency: (i) indicate a lack of ability to 10    operate a watercraft in a safe manner, or (ii) otherwise, 11    by operating the watercraft, be in violation of this Act.12(Source: P.A. 93-156, eff. 1-1-04.) 13    (625 ILCS 45/3-11)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 313-11)14    Sec. 3-11. Penalty. No person shall at any time: 15    (a) falsely alter or change in any manner a certificate of 16number issued under the provisions hereof; , or 17    (b) falsify any record required by this Act; ,18    (c) falsify information on any application to the 19Department that is required to be provided to the Department 20by this Act; or 21    (d) counterfeit any form of license provided for by this 22Act.23(Source: P.A. 100-469, eff. 6-1-18.) 24    (625 ILCS 45/4-2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-2)  SB2179 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1    Sec. 4-2. Navigation lights. 2    A. Watercraft subject to this Section shall be divided 3into classes as follows:4        1. Class 1: Less than 16 feet in length.5        2. Class 2: 16 feet or over and less than 26 feet in 6    length.7        3. Class 3: 26 feet or over and less than 40 feet in 8    length.9        4. Class 4: 40 feet or over and less than 65 feet in 10    length. 11    B. Every motorboat, underway from sunset to sunrise or 12underway in weather causing reduced visibility, shall carry 13and exhibit the following United States Coast Guard approved 14lights when underway and, during such time, shall not use any 15other lights that may be mistaken for or interfere with those 16prescribed as follows:17        1. A Class 1 or Class 2 motorboat shall carry the 18    following lights:19            (a) A bright white light aft to show all around the 20        horizon; and21            (b) A combined light in the fore part of the 22        watercraft and lower than the white light aft, showing 23        green to starboard and red to port, so fixed as to 24        throw the light from right ahead to 2 points (22.5 25        degrees) abaft the beam on their respective sides.26        2. A Class 3 or Class 4 motorboat shall carry the   SB2179 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1    following lights:2            (a) A bright white light in the fore part of the 3        watercraft as near the stern as practicable, so 4        constructed as to show the unbroken light over an arc 5        of the horizon of 20 points (225 degrees) of the 6        compass, so fixed as to throw the light 10 points 7        (112.5 degrees) on each side of the watercraft, 8        namely, from right ahead to 2 points (22.5 degrees) 9        abaft the beam on either side;10            (b) A bright white light aft, mounted higher than 11        the white light forward, to show all around the 12        horizon; and13            (c) On the starboard side, a green light so 14        constructed as to show an unbroken light over an arc of 15        the horizon of 10 points (112.5 degrees) of the 16        compass, so fixed as to throw the light from right 17        ahead to 2 points (22.5 degrees) abaft the beam on the 18        starboard side. On the port side, a red light so 19        constructed as to show an unbroken light over an arc of 20        the horizon of 10 points (112.5 degrees) of the 21        compass, so fixed as to throw the light from right 22        ahead to 2 points (22.5 degrees) abaft the beam on the 23        port side. The side lights shall be fitted with 24        inboard screens so set as to prevent these lights from 25        being seen across the bow.26        3. A Class 1 or Class 2 motorboat propelled by sail   SB2179 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1    alone shall exhibit the combined light prescribed by 2    paragraph (1) and a 12-point (135 degrees) white light 3    aft. A Class 3 or Class 4 motorboat, when so propelled, 4    shall exhibit the colored side lights, suitably screened 5    as prescribed by paragraph (2) and a 12-point (135 6    degrees) white light aft.7        4. Every white light prescribed by this Section shall 8    be of such character as to be visible at a distance of at 9    least 2 miles. Every colored light prescribed by this 10    Section shall be of such character as to be visible at a 11    distance of at least one mile. As used in this subsection 12    "visible", when applied to lights, means visible on a dark 13    night with clear atmosphere.14        5. If propelled by sail and machinery, a motorboat 15    shall carry the lights required by this Section for a 16    motorboat propelled by machinery only.17        6. All other watercraft over 65 feet in length and 18    those propelled solely by wind effect on the sail shall 19    display lights prescribed by federal regulations. 20    C. Nonpowered watercraft shall carry, ready at hand, a 21lantern or flashlight showing a white light that shall be 22exhibited in sufficient time to avert collision. Manually 23propelled watercraft used on the waters of this State where 24power-driven vessels are prohibited are exempt from the 25provisions of this Section.26    D. Any watercraft may carry and exhibit the lights   SB2179 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1required by the international regulations in lieu of the 2lights required by subsection B of this Section.3    E. All watercraft, when anchored, other than in a special 4anchorage area as defined in 33 CFR 109.10, shall, from sunset 5to sunrise, carry and display a steady white light visible all 6around the horizon for a distance of no less than 2 miles.7    F. The lights prescribed in this Section shall at minimum 8have an intensity so as to be visible at the minimum ranges as 9set forth in 33 CFR 83.22 (Blank).10    G. (Blank).11(Source: P.A. 102-595, eff. 6-1-22.) 12    (625 ILCS 45/4-4)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-4)13    Sec. 4-4. Whistles.) It is unlawful to operate a motorboat 14without a mouth, hand or power operated whistle, horn or other 15appliance, capable of producing a blast of 2 seconds or more 16duration and having an audible distance as set forth in 33 CFR 1786.01 for at least one-half mile. 18(Source: P.A. 82-783.) 19    (625 ILCS 45/4-11)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-11)20    Sec. 4-11. Engine cut-off switch. 21    (a) As used in this Section:22    "Engine cut-off switch link" means the lanyard or wireless 23cut-off device used to attach the motorboat operator to the 24engine cut-off switch installed on the motorboat.  SB2179 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1    "Engine cut-off switch" means an emergency switch 2installed on a motorboat that:3        (1) is designed to shut off the engine if:4                (A) the motorboat operator using a lanyard 5        attachment activates the switch by falling overboard 6        or otherwise moving beyond the length of the lanyard; 7        or8                (B) the motorboat operator or a passenger 9        using a wireless attachment activates the switch by 10        falling overboard and submerging a man-overboard 11        transmitter; and12            (2) attaches:13                (A) physically to the motorboat operator 14        through the use of a lanyard worn by the operator; or15                (B) wirelessly through the use of a 16        water-activated man-overboard transmitter worn by the 17        motorboat operator or any similarly equipped passenger 18        on the motorboat. means an operational emergency 19        cut-off engine stop switch installed on a motorboat 20        that attaches to a motorboat operator by an engine 21        cut-off switch link.22    (b) A motorboat operator may not operate a motorboat less 23than 26 feet in length that is equipped by the manufacturer 24with an engine cutoff switch and such switch is not in use 25while the motorboat is operating on plane or above 26displacement speed. No person may operate a watercraft without   SB2179 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1first verifying that the engine cut-off switch is operational 2and fully functional and properly attaching the lanyard or 3wireless attachment, as appropriate for the specific 4motorboat, to the operator's body or to the clothing or 5personal flotation device being worn by the operator.6    (c) The requirement under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) 7shall not apply if:8        (A) the main helm of the covered vessel is installed 9    within an enclosed cabin; or10        (B) the vessel does not have an engine cut-off switch. 11    No person may operate any motor boat, including personal 12    watercraft or specialty prop-craft, equipped with an 13    engine cut-off switch while the engine is running and the 14    motorboat is underway without verifying that the engine 15    cut-off switch is operational and fully-functional and:16        (1) the engine cut-off switch link is properly 17    attached to his or her person, clothing or worn PFD, as 18    appropriate for the specific vessel; or 19        (2) activating the wireless cut-off system. 20(Source: P.A. 96-1033, eff. 7-14-10.) 21    (625 ILCS 45/5-13)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 315-8)22    Sec. 5-13. Traffic rules. 23    A. The area straight ahead of a vessel to the point that is 2422.5 degrees beyond the middle of the vessel on the starboard 25side of the watercraft shall be designated the danger zone. An   SB2179 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1operator of a watercraft shall yield the right-of-way to any 2other watercraft occupying or entering into the danger zone 3that may result in collision.4    A-5. Head-on situation.5        (1) If 2 power-driven vessels are meeting head-on or 6    nearly head-on courses so as to involve risk of collision, 7    each shall alter course to starboard so that each shall 8    pass on the port side of the other.9        (2) A vessel proceeding along the course of a narrow 10    channel or canal shall keep as near to the outer limit of 11    the channel or canal that lies on the starboard side as is 12    safe and practicable.13        (3) A power-driven vessel operating in narrow channels 14    and proceeding downbound with a following current 15    downstream shall have the right-of-way over an upbound 16    vessel, shall propose the manner and place of passage, and 17    shall imitate the maneuvering signals as required by law a 18    vessel proceeding upstream. The vessel proceeding upstream 19    shall yield as necessary to permit safe passing. 20    B. Crossing. As used in this Section, "crossing" means 2 21or more watercraft traveling in directions that would have the 22path of travel of the watercraft intersect each other.23        (1) If 2 power-driven vessels are crossing so as to 24    involve the risk of collision, the vessel that has the 25    other on the starboard side shall keep out of the way and 26    shall avoid crossing ahead of the other vessel.  SB2179 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1        (2) A power-driven vessel crossing a river shall keep 2    out of the way of a power-driven vessel ascending or 3    descending the river.4        (3) A vessel may not cross a narrow channel or canal if 5    the crossing impedes the passage of a vessel that can only 6    safely navigate within the channel or canal. 7    C. Overtaking.8        (1) A vessel overtaking any other shall give way to 9    the vessel being overtaken.10        (2) If a vessel operator is in doubt as to whether he 11    or she is overtaking another vessel, the operator shall 12    assume he or she is overtaking the other vessel and shall 13    act accordingly.14        (3) Any subsequent alteration of the bearing between 15    the 2 vessels shall not make the overtaking vessel a 16    crossing vessel within the meaning of this Section or 17    relieve the overtaking operator of the duty to keep clear 18    of the overtaken vessel until finally past and clear.19        (4) When overtaking in a narrow channel or canal, the 20    operator of a power-driven vessel intending to overtake 21    another power-driven vessel shall proceed to pass safety 22    only after indicating his or her intention by sounding the 23    horn as follows:24            (a) one short blast from the horn signifies a 25        request to pass on the overtaken vessel's starboard 26        side;  SB2179 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1            (b) 2 short blasts from the horn signify a request 2        to pass on the overtaken vessel's port side.3        (5) The operator of the power-driven vessel being 4    overtaken shall:5            (a) acknowledge the request by sounding the same 6        signal; or7            (b) sound 5 short blasts from the horn to indicate 8        danger or to warn the overtaking vessel not to pass.9        No response from the overtaken vessel shall be 10    interpreted as an indication of danger and is the same as 11    if 5 short blasts from the horn were sounded. In the 12    absence of an audible signal or horn, a light signal 13    device using the appropriate number of rapid bursts of 14    light may be used. 15    D. Sailing vessels. 16        (1) The operator of a power-driven vessel shall yield 17    the right-of-way to any nonpowered or sailing vessel 18    unless the nonpowered vessel is overtaking the 19    power-driven vessel or when a large craft is navigating in 20    a confined channel, the large craft has the right-of-way 21    over a boat propelled solely by oars or sails.22        (2) If 2 sailing vessels are approaching one another, 23    so as to involve risk of collision, one of them shall keep 24    out of the way of the other as follows:25            (a) If each has the wind on a different side, the 26        vessel that has the wind on the port side shall give   SB2179 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1        way to the other vessel.2            (b) If both have the wind on the same side, the 3        vessel that is to windward shall give way to the vessel 4        that is to leeward.5            (c) If a vessel with the wind on the port side sees 6        a vessel to windward and cannot determine with 7        certainty whether the other vessel has the wind on the 8        port or starboard side, the vessel shall give way to 9        the other vessel. 10(Source: P.A. 102-595, eff. 6-1-22.) 11    (625 ILCS 45/5-18)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 315-13)12    Sec. 5-18. (a) No Beginning on January 1, 2016, no person 13born on or after January 1, 1998, unless exempted by 14subsection (i), shall operate a motorboat with over 10 horse 15power unless that person has a valid Boating Safety 16Certificate issued by the Department of Natural Resources or 17an entity or organization recognized and approved by the 18Department. 19    (b) No person under 10 years of age may operate a 20motorboat. 21    (c) Persons Prior to January 1, 2016, persons at least 10 22years of age and less than 12 years of age may operate a 23motorboat with over 10 horse power only if they are 24accompanied on the motorboat and under the direct control of a 25parent or guardian or a person at least 18 years of age   SB2179 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1designated by a parent or guardian. Beginning on January 1, 22016, persons at least 10 years of age and less than 12 years 3of age may operate a motorboat with over 10 horse power only if 4the person is under the direct on-board supervision of a 5parent or guardian who meets the requirements of subsection 6(a) or a person at least 18 years of age who meets the 7requirements of subsection (a) and is designated by a parent 8or guardian. 9    (d) Persons Prior to January 1, 2016, persons at least 12 10years of age and less than 18 years of age may operate a 11motorboat with over 10 horse power only if they are 12accompanied on the motorboat and under the direct control of a 13parent or guardian or a person at least 18 years of age 14designated by a parent or guardian, or the motorboat operator 15is in possession of a Boating Safety Certificate issued by the 16Department of Natural Resources, Division of Law Enforcement, 17authorizing the holder to operate motorboats. Beginning on 18January 1, 2016, persons at least 12 years and less than 18 19years of age may operate a motorboat with over 10 horse power 20only if the person meets the requirements of subsection (a) or 21is under the direct on-board supervision of a parent or 22guardian who meets the requirements of subsection (a) or a 23person at least 18 years of age who meets the requirements of 24subsection (a) and is designated by a parent or guardian. 25    (e) The Beginning January 1, 2016, the owner of a 26motorboat or a person given supervisory authority over a   SB2179 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1motorboat shall not permit a motorboat with over 10 horse 2power to be operated by a person who does not meet the Boating 3Safety Certificate requirements of this Section. 4    (f) Licensed boat liveries shall offer abbreviated 5operating and safety instruction covering core boat safety 6rules to all renters, unless the renter can demonstrate 7compliance with the Illinois Boating Safety Certificate 8requirements of this Section, or is exempt under subsection 9(i) of this Section. A person who completes abbreviated 10operating and safety instruction may operate a motorboat 11rented from the livery providing the abbreviated operating and 12safety instruction without having a Boating Safety Certificate 13for up to one year from the date of instruction. The Department 14shall adopt rules to implement this subsection. 15    (g) Violations. 16        (1) A person who is operating a motorboat with over 10 17    horse power and is required to have a valid Boating Safety 18    Certificate under the provisions of this Section shall 19    present the certificate to a law enforcement officer upon 20    request. Failure of the person to present the certificate 21    upon request is a petty offense. 22        (2) A person who provides false or fictitious 23    information in an application for a Boating Safety 24    Certificate; or who alters, forges, counterfeits, or 25    falsifies a Boating Safety Certificate; or who possesses a 26    Boating Safety Certificate that has been altered, forged,   SB2179 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1    counterfeited, or falsified is guilty of a Class A 2    misdemeanor. 3        (3) A person who loans or permits his or her Boating 4    Safety Certificate to be used by another person or who 5    operates a motorboat with over 10 horse power using a 6    Boating Safety Certificate that has not been issued to 7    that person is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor. 8        (4) A violation of this Section done with the 9    knowledge of a parent or guardian shall be deemed a 10    violation by the parent or guardian and punishable under 11    Section 11A-1.12    (h) The Department of Natural Resources shall establish a 13program of instruction on boating safety, laws, regulations 14and administrative laws, and any other subject matter which 15might be related to the subject of general boat safety. The 16program shall be conducted by instructors certified by the 17Department of Natural Resources. The course of instruction for 18persons certified to teach boating safety shall be not less 19than 8 hours in length, and the Department shall have the 20authority to revoke the certification of any instructor who 21has demonstrated his inability to conduct courses on the 22subject matter. The Department of Natural Resources shall 23develop and provide a method for students to complete the 24program online. Students satisfactorily completing a program 25of not less than 8 hours in length shall receive a certificate 26of safety from the Department of Natural Resources. The   SB2179 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1Department may cooperate with schools, online vendors, private 2clubs and other organizations in offering boating safety 3courses throughout the State of Illinois.4    The Department shall issue certificates of boating safety 5to persons 10 years of age or older successfully completing 6the prescribed course of instruction and passing such tests as 7may be prescribed by the Department. The Department may charge 8each person who enrolls in a course of instruction a fee not to 9exceed $5. If a fee is authorized by the Department, the 10Department shall authorize instructors conducting such courses 11meeting standards established by it to charge for the rental 12of facilities or for the cost of materials utilized in the 13course. Fees retained by the Department shall be utilized to 14defray a part of its expenses to operate the safety and 15accident reporting programs of the Department.16    (i) A Boating Safety Certificate is not required by: 17        (1) a person who possesses a valid United States Coast 18    Guard commercial vessel operator's license or a marine 19    certificate issued by the Canadian government; 20        (2) a person employed by the United States, this 21    State, another state, or a subdivision thereof while in 22    performance of his or her official duties; 23        (3) a person who is not a resident, is temporarily 24    using the waters of this State for a period not to exceed 25    90 days, and meets any applicable boating safety education 26    requirements of his or her state of residency or possesses   SB2179 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1    a Canadian Pleasure Craft Operator's Card; 2        (4) a person who is a resident of this State who has 3    met the applicable boating safety education requirements 4    of another state or possesses a Canadian Pleasure Craft 5    Operator's Card; 6        (5) a person who has assumed operation of the 7    motorboat due to the illness or physical impairment of the 8    operator, and is returning the motorboat or personal 9    watercraft to shore in order to provide assistance or care 10    for that operator; 11        (6) a person who is registered as a commercial 12    fisherman or a person who is under the onboard direct 13    supervision of the commercial fisherman while operating 14    the commercial fisherman's vessel; 15        (7) a person who is serving or has qualified as a 16    surface warfare officer or enlisted surface warfare 17    specialist in the United States Navy; 18        (8) a person who has assumed operation of the 19    motorboat for the purpose of completing a watercraft 20    safety course approved by the Department, the U.S. Coast 21    Guard, or the National Association of State Boating Law 22    Administrators; 23        (9) a person using only an electric motor to propel 24    the motorboat;25        (10) a person operating a motorboat on private 26    property;   SB2179 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1        (11) a person over the age of 12 years who holds a 2    valid certificate issued by another state, a province of 3    the Dominion of Canada, the United States Coast Guard 4    Auxiliary or the United States Power Squadron need not 5    obtain a certificate from the Department if the course 6    content of the program in such other state, province or 7    organization substantially meets that established by the 8    Department under this Section. A certificate issued by the 9    Department or by another state, province of the Dominion 10    of Canada or approved organization shall not constitute an 11    operator's license, but shall certify only that the 12    student has successfully passed a course in boating safety 13    instruction; or14        (12) a person who is temporarily using the waters of 15    this State for the purpose of participating in a boat 16    racing event sanctioned by the Department of Natural 17    Resources or authorized federal agency. The organizer or 18    holder of the sanctioned event shall possess liability 19    insurance for property damage and bodily injury or death 20    with a minimum benefit of $1,000,000 that shall remain in 21    effect through the entirety of the event. 22    (j) The Department of Natural Resources shall adopt rules 23necessary to implement this Section. The Department of Natural 24Resources shall consult and coordinate with the boating 25public, professional organizations for recreational boating 26safety, and the boating retail, leasing, and dealer business   SB2179 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1community in the adoption of these rules. 2(Source: P.A. 98-698, eff. 1-1-15; 99-78, eff. 7-20-15; 399-526, eff. 7-8-16.) 4    (625 ILCS 45/7-1)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 317-1)5    Sec. 7-1. It On and after March 1, 1960 it shall be 6unlawful for any person to engage in the business of operating 7a boat or boats carrying passengers for hire, or renting a boat 8or boats for hire without first having obtained a license so to 9do from the Department. Such license shall be renewable each 10year on January March 1st, shall be good only for one year or 11portion of a year up to and including December 31st March 1st, 12and it shall be unlawful for such person to so engage in such 13business without having a valid license currently then in 14force. The Department shall outline the application process 15for passenger-for-hire licenses or rental boat licenses by 16administrative rule. Violations of this Act by a business or 17individual holding a rental license or passenger-for-hire 18license shall result in the suspension or revocation of the 19license issued based on the procedures outlined in 20administrative rule. 21(Source: P.A. 85-149.) 22    (625 ILCS 45/7-2)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 317-2)23    Sec. 7-2. License fee. The fee for a license to operate a 24boat for carrying passengers for hire shall be established by   SB2179 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1administrative rule $50 for each boat. The fee for a license 2for engaging in the business of renting boats for hire and the 3shall be $30, plus an annual fee for each boat rented or 4offered for rent shall be set by administrative rule of $1 for 5each boat less than 16 feet in length; $2 for each boat 16 feet 6or over and less than 26 feet in length; and $8 for each boat 726 feet or over in length. No boat shall, after March 1, 1960, 8be rented or offered for rent until such license has been 9granted and the boat marked as hereinafter provided.10(Source: P.A. 85-149.)  SB2179 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 12160 LNS 22261 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    625 ILCS 45/1-2from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 311-24    625 ILCS 45/2-2from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 312-25    625 ILCS 45/3-11from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 313-116    625 ILCS 45/4-2from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-27    625 ILCS 45/4-4from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-48    625 ILCS 45/4-11from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 314-119    625 ILCS 45/5-13from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 315-810    625 ILCS 45/5-18from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 315-1311    625 ILCS 45/5-24 new12    625 ILCS 45/5-25 new13    625 ILCS 45/7-1from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 317-114    625 ILCS 45/7-2from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 317-2